Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 0 ket .

SFX 979 N 1
SFX 979 0 ketonuria .

SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 0 khar .

SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 0 khpur .

SFX 982 N 1
SFX 982 0 king .

SFX 983 N 1
SFX 983 0 kkale .

SFX 984 N 1
SFX 984 0 konam .

SFX 985 N 1
SFX 985 0 konko .

SFX 986 N 1
SFX 986 0 kuang .

SFX 987 N 1
SFX 987 0 ky .

SFX 988 N 1
SFX 988 0 l .

SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 0 la .

SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 0 lable .

SFX 991 N 1
SFX 991 0 lacat .

SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 0 laceous .

SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 0 lacia .

SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 0 lacias .

SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 0 lag .

SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 0 lags .

SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 0 lana .

SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 0 land .

SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 0 lands .

SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 0 lane .

SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 0 lang .

SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 0 larization .

SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 0 las .

SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 0 lase .

SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 0 late .

SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 0 lated .

SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 0 lateration .

SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 0 lates .

SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 0 lating .

SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 0 lation .

SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 0 lations .

SFX 1012 N 1
SFX 1012 0 layered .

SFX 1013 N 1
SFX 1013 0 lbari .

SFX 1014 N 1
SFX 1014 0 lbenzene .

SFX 1015 N 1
SFX 1015 0 lbenzenesulfonate .

SFX 1016 N 1
SFX 1016 0 lce .

SFX 1017 N 1
SFX 1017 0 lcula .

SFX 1018 N 1
SFX 1018 0 lculum .

SFX 1019 N 1
SFX 1019 0 le .

SFX 1020 N 1
SFX 1020 0 learning .

SFX 1021 N 1
SFX 1021 0 led .

SFX 1022 N 1
SFX 1022 0 lee .

SFX 1023 N 1
SFX 1023 0 lees .

SFX 1024 N 1
SFX 1024 0 leh .

SFX 1025 N 1
SFX 1025 0 lei .

SFX 1026 N 1
SFX 1026 0 les .

SFX 1027 N 1
SFX 1027 0 lesAndWestCaicos .

SFX 1028 N 1
SFX 1028 0 less .

SFX 1029 N 1
SFX 1029 0 lessly .

SFX 1030 N 1
SFX 1030 0 lessness .

SFX 1031 N 1
SFX 1031 0 let .

SFX 1032 N 1
SFX 1032 0 lets .

SFX 1033 N 1
SFX 1033 0 lgia .

SFX 1034 N 1
SFX 1034 0 lgias .

SFX 1035 N 1
SFX 1035 0 li .

SFX 1036 N 1
SFX 1036 0 liads .

SFX 1037 N 1
SFX 1037 0 lianchi .

SFX 1038 N 1
SFX 1038 0 lic .

SFX 1039 N 1
SFX 1039 0 like .

SFX 1040 N 1
SFX 1040 0 lin .

SFX 1041 N 1
SFX 1041 0 lineal .

SFX 1042 N 1
SFX 1042 0 liness .

SFX 1043 N 1
SFX 1043 0 linesses .

SFX 1044 N 1
SFX 1044 0 ling .

SFX 1045 N 1
SFX 1045 0 lingly .

SFX 1046 N 1
SFX 1046 0 linguist .

SFX 1047 N 1
SFX 1047 0 linguistically .

SFX 1048 N 1
SFX 1048 0 linguists .

SFX 1049 N 1
SFX 1049 0 linhot .

SFX 1050 N 1
SFX 1050 0 lins .

SFX 1051 N 1
SFX 1051 0 liosis .

SFX 1052 N 1
SFX 1052 0 lisation .

SFX 1053 N 1
SFX 1053 0 lisations .

SFX 1054 N 1
SFX 1054 0 lise .

SFX 1055 N 1
SFX 1055 0 lised .

SFX 1056 N 1
SFX 1056 0 lises .

SFX 1057 N 1
SFX 1057 0 lising .

SFX 1058 N 1
SFX 1058 0 lism .

SFX 1059 N 1
SFX 1059 0 lisms .

SFX 1060 N 1
SFX 1060 0 list .

SFX 1061 N 1
SFX 1061 0 listic .

SFX 1062 N 1
SFX 1062 0 lists .

SFX 1063 N 1
SFX 1063 0 lite .

SFX 1064 N 1
SFX 1064 0 lites .

SFX 1065 N 1
SFX 1065 0 lith .

SFX 1066 N 1
SFX 1066 0 liths .

SFX 1067 N 1
SFX 1067 0 lities .

SFX 1068 N 1
SFX 1068 0 lity .

SFX 1069 N 1
SFX 1069 0 lium .

SFX 1070 N 1
SFX 1070 0 liyah .

SFX 1071 N 1
SFX 1071 0 lization .

SFX 1072 N 1
SFX 1072 0 lizations .

SFX 1073 N 1
SFX 1073 0 lize .

SFX 1074 N 1
SFX 1074 0 lized .

SFX 1075 N 1
SFX 1075 0 lizes .

SFX 1076 N 1
SFX 1076 0 lizing .

SFX 1077 N 1
SFX 1077 0 ll .

SFX 1078 N 1
SFX 1078 0 lla .

SFX 1079 N 1
SFX 1079 0 llanes .

SFX 1080 N 1
SFX 1080 0 llas .

SFX 1081 N 1
SFX 1081 0 llectible .

SFX 1082 N 1
SFX 1082 0 lled .

SFX 1083 N 1
SFX 1083 0 ller .

SFX 1084 N 1
SFX 1084 0 llers .

SFX 1085 N 1
SFX 1085 0 lling .

SFX 1086 N 1
SFX 1086 0 llings .

SFX 1087 N 1
SFX 1087 0 lly .

SFX 1088 N 1
SFX 1088 0 lmelik .

SFX 1089 N 1
SFX 1089 0 lness .

SFX 1090 N 1
SFX 1090 0 lnesses .

SFX 1091 N 1
SFX 1091 0 logic .

SFX 1092 N 1
SFX 1092 0 logies .

SFX 1093 N 1
SFX 1093 0 logy .

SFX 1094 N 1
SFX 1094 0 loi .

SFX 1095 N 1
SFX 1095 0 loured .

SFX 1096 N 1
SFX 1096 0 lousness .

SFX 1097 N 1
SFX 1097 0 lousnesses .

SFX 1098 N 1
SFX 1098 0 lp .

SFX 1099 N 1
SFX 1099 0 lpox .

SFX 1100 N 1
SFX 1100 0 ls .

SFX 1101 N 1
SFX 1101 0 lsuud .

SFX 1102 N 1
SFX 1102 0 lto .

SFX 1103 N 1
SFX 1103 0 ltonians .

SFX 1104 N 1
SFX 1104 0 lumin .

SFX 1105 N 1
SFX 1105 0 lumned .

SFX 1106 N 1
SFX 1106 0 lune .

SFX 1107 N 1
SFX 1107 0 lunes .

SFX 1108 N 1
SFX 1108 0 ly .

SFX 1109 N 1
SFX 1109 0 lymph .

SFX 1110 N 1
SFX 1110 0 m .

SFX 1111 N 1
SFX 1111 0 ma .

SFX 1112 N 1
SFX 1112 0 machines .

SFX 1113 N 1
SFX 1113 0 magnetic .

SFX 1114 N 1
SFX 1114 0 maid .

SFX 1115 N 1
SFX 1115 0  Major .

SFX 1116 N 1
SFX 1116 0  Majoris .

SFX 1117 N 1
SFX 1117 0 mako .

SFX 1118 N 1
SFX 1118 0 malonylurea .

SFX 1119 N 1
SFX 1119 0 mammal .

SFX 1120 N 1
SFX 1120 0 mammalogy .

SFX 1121 N 1
SFX 1121 0 man .

SFX 1122 N 1
SFX 1122 0 manufacturing .

SFX 1123 N 1
SFX 1123 0 mar .

SFX 1124 N 1
SFX 1124 0 marine .

SFX 1125 N 1
SFX 1125 0 mast .

SFX 1126 N 1
SFX 1126 0 masts .

SFX 1127 N 1
SFX 1127 0 material .

SFX 1128 N 1
SFX 1128 0 materials .

SFX 1129 N 1
SFX 1129 0 matic .

SFX 1130 N 1
SFX 1130 0 matically .

SFX 1131 N 1
SFX 1131 0 mbable .

SFX 1132 N 1
SFX 1132 0 mbasthenia .

SFX 1133 N 1
SFX 1133 0 mbectomy .

SFX 1134 N 1
SFX 1134 0 mbiguator .

SFX 1135 N 1
SFX 1135 0 mbin .

SFX 1136 N 1
SFX 1136 0 mbins .

SFX 1137 N 1
SFX 1137 0 mbocyte .

SFX 1138 N 1
SFX 1138 0 mbocytes .

SFX 1139 N 1
SFX 1139 0 mbocytopenia .

SFX 1140 N 1
SFX 1140 0 mbocytopenias .

SFX 1141 N 1
SFX 1141 0 mbocytosis .

SFX 1142 N 1
SFX 1142 0 mboembolism .

SFX 1143 N 1
SFX 1143 0 mboembolisms .

SFX 1144 N 1
SFX 1144 0 mbokinase .

SFX 1145 N 1
SFX 1145 0 mbokinases .

SFX 1146 N 1
SFX 1146 0 mbolysis .

SFX 1147 N 1
SFX 1147 0 mbolytic .

SFX 1148 N 1
SFX 1148 0 mbopenia .

SFX 1149 N 1
SFX 1149 0 mbophlebitides .

SFX 1150 N 1
SFX 1150 0 mbophlebitis .

SFX 1151 N 1
SFX 1151 0 mboplastin .

SFX 1152 N 1
SFX 1152 0 mboplastins .

SFX 1153 N 1
SFX 1153 0 mbose .

SFX 1154 N 1
SFX 1154 0 mbosed .

SFX 1155 N 1
SFX 1155 0 mboses .

SFX 1156 N 1
SFX 1156 0 mbosing .

SFX 1157 N 1
SFX 1157 0 mbre .

SFX 1158 N 1
SFX 1158 0 med .

SFX 1159 N 1
SFX 1159 0 megaly .

SFX 1160 N 1
SFX 1160 0 mely .

SFX 1161 N 1
SFX 1161 0 members .

SFX 1162 N 1
SFX 1162 0 men .

SFX 1163 N 1
SFX 1163 0 mens .

SFX 1164 N 1
SFX 1164 0 ment .

SFX 1165 N 1
SFX 1165 0 mentalisation .

SFX 1166 N 1
SFX 1166 0 mentalise .

SFX 1167 N 1
SFX 1167 0 mentalised .

SFX 1168 N 1
SFX 1168 0 mentalises .

SFX 1169 N 1
SFX 1169 0 mentalising .

SFX 1170 N 1
SFX 1170 0 mentation .

SFX 1171 N 1
SFX 1171 0 mented .

SFX 1172 N 1
SFX 1172 0 menting .

SFX 1173 N 1
SFX 1173 0 mentlike .

SFX 1174 N 1
SFX 1174 0 ments .

SFX 1175 N 1
SFX 1175 0 mer .

SFX 1176 N 1
SFX 1176 0 merce .

SFX 1177 N 1
SFX 1177 0 mesh .

SFX 1178 N 1
SFX 1178 0 meshes .

SFX 1179 N 1
SFX 1179 0 meter .

SFX 1180 N 1
SFX 1180 0 meters .

SFX 1181 N 1
SFX 1181 0 methyl .

SFX 1182 N 1
SFX 1182 0 metre .

SFX 1183 N 1
SFX 1183 0 metres .

SFX 1184 N 1
SFX 1184 0 metric .

SFX 1185 N 1
SFX 1185 0 metrics .

SFX 1186 N 1
SFX 1186 0 metries .

SFX 1187 N 1
SFX 1187 0 metry .

SFX 1188 N 1
SFX 1188 0 mgram .

SFX 1189 N 1
SFX 1189 0 mia .

SFX 1190 N 1
SFX 1190 0 mias .

SFX 1191 N 1
SFX 1191 0 mic .

SFX 1192 N 1
SFX 1192 0 million .

SFX 1193 N 1
SFX 1193 0 ming .

SFX 1194 N 1
SFX 1194 0  Minor .

SFX 1195 N 1
SFX 1195 0  Minoris .

SFX 1196 N 1
SFX 1196 0 mmercial .

SFX 1197 N 1
SFX 1197 0 mmercialised .

SFX 1198 N 1
SFX 1198 0 mmercialized .

SFX 1199 N 1
SFX 1199 0 mmunicativeness .

SFX 1200 N 1
SFX 1200 0 mmunicativenesses .

SFX 1201 N 1
SFX 1201 0 modal .

SFX 1202 N 1
SFX 1202 0 mode .

SFX 1203 N 1
SFX 1203 0 mong .

SFX 1204 N 1
SFX 1204 0 monger .

SFX 1205 N 1
SFX 1205 0 mongers .

SFX 1206 N 1
SFX 1206 0 mparable .

SFX 1207 N 1
SFX 1207 0 mparably .

SFX 1208 N 1
SFX 1208 0 mpartmented .

SFX 1209 N 1
SFX 1209 0 mpassionate .

SFX 1210 N 1
SFX 1210 0 mplete .

SFX 1211 N 1
SFX 1211 0 mprehended .

SFX 1212 N 1
SFX 1212 0 mprehensible .
