Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
abaxial/1108
abomasa/988
acapnia/988,1682
adaxial/1108
adnexa/988
adventitia/988,1682
advertent/1108
aecia/988
aggrandise/1164,1174
alky/988,1006,1009,1010,1014,1015,1038,1100,1260,1274
ambulacra/988
amenorrhea/988,1682
amenorrhoea/988,1682
amora/1058,1059,1060,1062
annexa/988,1840
apothecia/988
appal/1021,1044,1682
Appel/988
archaea/988,1228
archegonia/988,1794
archesporia/988
argil/992,1063,1064
aril/565,1005,1682
arteria/1054,1055,1056,1057,1073,1074,1075,1076,1100
avifauna/988,1682
axil/557,989,1003,1682
azote/1189,1190,1191,1682
Banda/1111,1590
basidia/988
Bata/989,1110,1285,1286,2015
Belo/1157,1948
bimetal/1060,1061,1062,1682
binaural/1108
biradial/1108
blastema/988,1682,1833
brachia/988,1794,1796,1816,1838,1839,1841
branchia/557,988,1794
Buga/1111
caeca/988
Canis/1115,1116,1194,1195
catamenia/988
catechu/1162,1163,1682
causa/1033,1034
centra/1052,1053,1054,1055,1057,1061,1605
cepstra/988
cercaria/557,988,1682
chaeta/557,988
Chas/1026
chelicera/557,988,1794
chromatographical/1108
compart/565,882,1165,1166,1167,1168,1169,1171,1682
Cowe/1077
crenel/565,882,1005,1006,1008,1009,1010,1011,1019,1682
currish/1108
cyanobacteria/988
dah/988
defence/1028,1029,1030,1121,1162,1682
deprecative/1108
despiteful/1108
deuced/1108
diarrhoea/988,1682
diethyl/1118,1764,1765,1766,1767
digitate/1108
disembarrass/565,646,882,1164,1174
dorsoventral/1108
dura/988,1104,1162,1163
dyspnea/988,1682
dyspnoea/988
embrittle/1164
emulous/1108
endothelia/988
enfeoff/565,1164
enrol/1021,1022,1023,1044,1164,1174,1682
enthral/1021,1044,1045,1682
eschatological/1108
Este/1035
facultative/1108
fenestra/557,988,1682
feria/988,1682
fledge/510,1028,1682
fulfil/1021,1044,1164,1174,1682
gingiva/557,988
glossa/1033,1644,1682
Gonda/988,1590
Gora/981
Hami/1103,1682
hieroglyphical/1108
hypha/557,988
impactful/1108
incase/510,1164,1174
inconsequent/1108
indusia/988
inefficacious/1108,1275,1276
inscriptive/1108
intima/988,1682
intradermal/1108
Jong/980,1025
ketone/1189,1682
Kie/1016,1228
Kiri/983
knawe/988,1100,1682
Komi/1078
Kumba/984
Leo/1194
Leonis/1195
lightsome/1108,1275,1276
limnological/1108
lingua/557,1087,1682
lipide/1189,1682
logogram/1129,1130,1682
lustre/1028,1030,1682
Maba/991
Madhya/1188
Mage/1001
magi/1098,1775
Mahal/989
mako/1117,1682
Manica/998
Mansa/985
marcel/1021,1044,1682
marvellous/1108
Mato/989
matrilineal/1108
maxima/1060,1839
meagre/1108,1590,1754
meanspirited/1108
mediastina/988
megafauna/988
minisub/1124
mizen/1125,1126,1682
Mogi/989
mola/1068,1682
mordacious/1108
murre/1031,1682
muscadel/1019,1682
mycelia/988
mycobacteria/988
myofibril/989,1682
Naga/998
Nantong/986
noncomprehensive/1108
nonlexical/1108
nucha/988
Offa/1108
offence/1028,1682
Olomouc/987
Orel/997
osteoma/993,994,1682
otherworld/1042,1043
overrefine/1164,1174
pachyderma/988,1882
palpebra/988,1794,1839
parenchyma/988,1682
parlour/1114,1682
patrilineal/1108
patronising/1108
pennoncel/1019,1026,1682
philatelical/1108
pipistrel/1019,1026,1682
popish/1108
precedented/1108
prima/1068,1587,1817,1818,1832,1866,1867,1868
prodroma/988
Providencia/1027
reallot/1164,1174
recti/1041
refreshful/1108
Ria/1102
rickettsia/988,1099,1682
rumour/565,882,1204,1205,1682
sarcolemma/988,1682
scale/1039,1300,1370,1590,1999
schismatical/1108
schtik/988
sclera/988,1682
secern/212,565,882,1164,1682
Shama/988,1070
shtik/988
sima/988
singlehanded/1108
sporophyl/988,1100,1682
striata/988
stroma/988,1786,1797
substantia/1067,1068,1089,1090,1849
sutura/988
synovia/988,1682
tasse/1082,1682,1785,1893
tchotchke/1024
telecom/1176,1220,1221,1222,1223
terce/988,1031,1032,1100,1682,1785,1893
trave/990,1082,1083,1084,1085,1668,1669,1677,1682
trepid/1108
unharmonious/1108
unilingual/1108
uninstructive/1108
unmanful/1108
urate/1189
Ursae/1116,1195
vagi/1019,1238,1322,1325,1326,1343
vanda/1054,1055,1056,1057,1682
verticil/1005,1006,1051,1069,1682
volumetrical/1108
voyeuristical/1108
wilful/1108
Wuda/1037
xanthophyl/988,1100
zori/988,1100,1682
